hu: Elektromos jármű átalakító készlet hajtáslánc-konfigurációja: Közvetlen hajtás; Kétmotoros (elöl/hátul); Kerékagymotor; Középmotoros hajtás; Lassító áttételes hajtás; Meglévő sebességváltó megtartásával; áttételes; egysebességes; Egyéb
el: Διαμόρφωση κιτ μετατροπής EV για σύστημα μετάδοσης κίνησης: Απευθείας μετάδοση; Διπλός κινητήρας (εμπρός/πίσω); Κινητήρας πλήμνης; Κεντρικός κινητήρας; Μετάδοση με μειωτήρα; Διατηρεί το υπάρχον κιβώτιο ταχυτήτων; με γρανάζια; μίας ταχύτητας; Άλλο
tr: EV dönüşüm kit aktarma organı yapılandırması: Doğrudan tahrikli; Çift motor (ön/arka); Hub motor; Orta tahrikli; Redüksiyon tahrikli; Mevcut şanzımanı korur; dişlili; tek vitesli; Diğer
de: Antriebskonfiguration des EV-Umrüstkits: Direktantrieb; Doppelmotor (vorne/hinten); Radnabenmotor; Mittelmotor; Untersetzungsgetriebe; Behält vorhandenes Getriebe; mit Getriebe; Single-Speed; Sonstige
es: Configuración del sistema de transmisión del kit de conversión de vehículos eléctricos: Transmisión directa; Motor dual (delantero/trasero); Motor en cubo; Motor central; Transmisión por reducción; Conserva la transmisión existente; con engranajes; de una velocidad; Otro
vi: Cấu hình hệ thống truyền động của bộ chuyển đổi EV: Truyền động trực tiếp; Động cơ kép (trước/sau); Động cơ liền bánh; Động cơ đặt giữa; Truyền động giảm tốc; Giữ nguyên hộp số hiện có; có hộp số; một tốc độ; Khác
pt-PT: configuração do grupo motopropulsor do kit de conversão para veículos elétricos: Acionamento direto; Motor duplo (dianteiro/traseiro); Motor de cubo; Motor central; Acionamento de redução; Mantém a transmissão existente; com engrenagem; velocidade única; Outro
fi: Sähköajoneuvon muunnossarjan voimansiirto: Suoraveto; Kaksoismoottori (etu/taka); Napamoottori; Keskimoottori; Alennusvaihde; Säilyttää nykyisen vaihteiston; vaihteellinen; yksivaihteinen; Muu
nl: Elektrisch voertuig ombouwset aandrijflijnconfiguratie: Directe aandrijving; Dubbele motor (voor/achter); Naafmotor; Middenmotor; Reductie-aandrijving; Behoudt bestaande transmissie; met overbrenging; single-speed; Overig
lt-LT: EV konversijos rinkinio pavaros sistemos konfigūracija: Tiesioginė pavara; Du varikliai (priekyje / gale); Variklis rate; Centrinė pavara; Redukcinė pavara; Išlaiko esamą transmisiją; su pavara; viena pavara; Kita
ja: EVコンバージョンキットのドライブトレイン構成: ダイレクトドライブ; デュアルモーター (フロント/リア); ハブモーター; ミッドドライブ; 減速ドライブ; 既存のトランスミッションを保持; ギア付き; シングルスピード; その他
hr-HR: EV konverzija kompletna konfiguracija pogona: Izravni pogon; Dvostruki motor (prednji/stražnji); Motor u kotaču; Središnji pogon; Redukcijski pogon; Zadržava postojeći prijenos; s prijenosom; jednobrzinski; Ostalo
ko: EV 전환 키트 구동계 구성: 다이렉트 드라이브; 듀얼 모터(전/후방); 허브 모터; 미드 드라이브; 감속 드라이브; 기존 변속기 유지; 기어형; 싱글 스피드; 기타
en: EV conversion kit drivetrain configuration: Direct drive; Dual motor (front/rear); Hub motor; Mid-drive; Reduction drive; Retains existing transmission; geared; single-speed; Other
sv: Drivlinekonfiguration för EV-konverteringssats: Direktdrift; Dubbla motorer (fram/bak); Navmotor; Mittmonterad; Reduktionsväxel; Behåller befintlig transmission; växlad; enväxlad; Övrigt
pl: Konfiguracja układu napędowego zestawu do konwersji na EV: Napęd bezpośredni; Dwa silniki (przód/tył); Silnik w piaście; Napęd centralny; Napęd z reduktorem; Zachowuje istniejącą skrzynię biegów; z przekładnią; jednobiegowy; Inne
zh-TW: 電動車改裝套件傳動系統配置: 直驅; 雙馬達 (前/後); 輪轂馬達; 中置驅動; 減速驅動; 保留現有變速箱; 齒輪傳動; 單速; 其他
sl-SI: Konfiguracija pogonskega sklopa kompleta za predelavo v električno vozilo: Neposredni pogon; Dvojni motor (spredaj/zadaj); Kolesni motor; Sredinski pogon; Reduktorski pogon; Ohrani obstoječi menjalnik; z zobniškim prenosom; enostopenjski; Drugo
ro-RO: Configurația sistemului de transmisie al kitului de conversie la VE: Transmisie directă; Motor dual (față/spate); Motor pe butuc; Motor central; Transmisie cu reductor; Păstrează transmisia existentă; cu reductor; cu o singură viteză; Altele
bg-BG: Конфигурация на задвижването на комплект за конверсия към електромобил: Директно задвижване; Двоен двигател (преден/заден); Мотор в главината; Средно задвижване; Редукторно задвижване; Запазва съществуващата трансмисия; със зъбна предавка; една скорост; Други
cs: Konfigurace hnacího ústrojí sady pro přestavbu na elektromobil: Přímý pohon; Dva motory (vpředu/vzadu); Motor v náboji; Středový pohon; Redukční pohon; Zachovává stávající převodovku; s převodovkou; jednorychlostní; Jiné
da: Konfiguration af drivlinjen i et konverteringssæt til elbil: Direkte drev; Dobbelt motor (for/bag); Navmotor; Centermotor; Reduktionsdrev; Bevarer eksisterende transmission; med gear; enkeltgear; Andet
it: configurazione del sistema di trasmissione del kit di conversione EV: Presa diretta; Doppio motore (anteriore/posteriore); Motore nel mozzo; Motore centrale; Riduttore; Mantiene la trasmissione esistente; con ingranaggi; a singola velocità; Altro
pt-BR: Configuração do trem de força do kit de conversão para veículos elétricos: Acionamento direto; Motor duplo (dianteiro/traseiro); Motor de cubo; Motor central; Acionamento de redução; Mantém a transmissão existente; com engrenagem; velocidade única; Outro
nb: Konfigurasjon av drivverket for EV-veksling/veksling: Direktedrift; Dobbel motor (foran/bak); Navmotor; Midtmontert motor; Reduksjonsgir; Beholder eksisterende girkasse; med gir; ett gir; Annet
th: รูปแบบระบบขับเคลื่อนของชุดแปลงรถยนต์ EV: ขับเคลื่อนโดยตรง; มอเตอร์คู่ (หน้า/หลัง); มอเตอร์ดุมล้อ; ขับเคลื่อนตรงกลาง; ขับเคลื่อนแบบทดรอบ; ใช้ระบบส่งกำลังเดิม; มีเกียร์; ความเร็วเดียว; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 电动车改装套件传动系统配置: 直驱; 双电机（前/后）; 轮毂电机; 中置驱动; 减速驱动; 保留现有变速箱; 齿轮传动; 单速; 其他
sk-SK: Konfigurácia pohonu súpravy na konverziu na elektromobil: Priamy pohon; Dva motory (vpredu/vzadu); Kolesový motor; Stredový pohon; Redukčný pohon; Zachováva pôvodnú prevodovku; prevodový; jednorýchlostný; Iné
ru: Конфигурация трансмиссии набора для переоборудования в электромобиль: Прямой привод; Два двигателя (передний/задний); Мотор-колесо; Центральный привод; Привод с редуктором; С сохранением существующей трансмиссии; с редуктором; односкоростной; Другое
fr: Configuration de la transmission du kit de conversion pour véhicule électrique: Entraînement direct; Double moteur (avant/arrière); Moteur-roue; Moteur central; Entraînement par réducteur; Conserve la transmission existante; à engrenages; à vitesse unique; Autre